Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
CHAPTER 6A Georgia Fair Lending Act
7-6A-8.
Enforcement of chapter; penalties for violations.

The Attorney General, the district attorneys of this state, and the commissioner of banking and finance shall have jurisdiction to enforce this chapter through their general regulatory powers and through civil process. The Commissioner of Insurance shall have like authority to enforce paragraph (1) of Code Section 7-6A-3.

Any person, including members, officers, and directors of a creditor, who knowingly violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction, is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000.00 for each violation or to imprisonment not exceeding six months, or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-6A-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 455, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 1, § 1.

7-6A-9.
Terms of insurer providing insurance through financed premiums.

A creditor or servicer or an insurer providing insurance through premiums financed by a creditor of a home loan who, when acting in good faith, fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter will not be deemed to have violated this chapter if the creditor or servicer or insurer providing insurance through premiums financed by a creditor establishes that either:

Within 90 days of the loan closing and prior to receiving any notice from the borrower of the compliance failure, (A) the creditor or servicer has offered appropriate restitution to the borrower and appropriate adjustments are made to the loan or (B) to correct a compliance failure of paragraph (1) of Code Section 7-6A-3, an insurer providing insurance through premiums financed by a creditor may provide appropriate restitution to the borrower by returning premiums paid plus interest charged on the premiums to the borrower upon receipt of notice of the compliance failure; or

Within 90 days of discovering a compliance failure and prior to receiving any notice of the compliance failure and the compliance failure was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid such errors, the borrower is notified of the compliance failure, appropriate restitution is offered to the borrower, and appropriate adjustments are made to the loan. Examples of a bona fide error include clerical, calculation, computer malfunction and programming, and printing errors. An error of legal judgment with respect to a person’s obligations under this chapter is not a bona fide error.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-6A-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 455, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 1, § 1.

7-6A-10.
Severability of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall be severable and, if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is declared to be invalid or is preempted by federal law or regulation, the validity of the remainder of this chapter shall not be affected thereby. If any provision of this chapter is declared to be inapplicable to any category of persons or any specific category, type, or kind of loan or portions thereof, the provisions of this chapter shall nonetheless continue to apply with respect to all other persons and all other loans or portions thereof.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-6A-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 455, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 1, § 1.

7-6A-11.
Municipality or county not able to regulate terms of home loans.

No municipality or county shall enact any ordinance or law that regulates the terms of home loans or that makes the eligibility of any person or entity to do business with the municipality or county dependent upon the terms of home loans originated or serviced by such person or entity.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-6A-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 455, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 1, § 1.

7-6A-12.
Application; preemption by federal law.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any bank, trust company, savings and loan, savings bank, credit union, or subsidiary thereof, respectively, that is chartered under the laws of this state or any other state only to the extent federal law precludes or preempts or has been determined to preclude or preempt the application of the provisions of this chapter to any federally chartered bank, trust company, savings and loan, savings bank, or credit union, respectively, and such federal preclusion or preemption shall apply only to the same type of state chartered entity as the federally chartered entity affected; provided, however, that the provisions of this chapter, including subsection (f) of Code Section 7-6A-7, shall be applicable to an independent mortgage broker for any loan originated or brokered by the broker that is initially funded by any state or federally chartered bank, trust company, savings and loan, savings bank, or credit union.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-6A-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 1, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, however, that the provisions” for “provided, however, the provisions” in the proviso of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 enactment of this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2003).

7-6A-13.
Promulgation of rules and regulations; creditor’s good faith reliance on guidance from department constituting prima-facie evidence of compliance.

Without limitations on the power conferred by Chapter 1 of this title, the Department of Banking and Finance shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations not inconsistent with law for the enforcement of this chapter to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and to clarify the meaning of terms. In complying with this chapter, a creditor’s good faith reliance on any formal or informal written guidance of the Department of Banking and Finance previously made available to the general public shall constitute prima-facie evidence of compliance with this chapter. The provisions of this Code section shall apply even if, following the reliance, such guidance is amended, rescinded, or determined by any judicial or other authority to be invalid.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-6A-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 1, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 enactment of this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2003).